lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5677 Y 2
SFX 5677 kti nka/482 . 337
SFX 5677 ktis nkasi/482 . 337

SFX 5687 Y 1
SFX 5687 kti nkie/483 . 337

SFX 5688 Y 1
SFX 5688 ktis nkie/484 . 337

SFX 5689 Y 2
SFX 5689 kti ko/485 . 338
SFX 5689 ktis kosi/485 . 338

SFX 5690 Y 2
SFX 5690 kti ko/486 . 338
SFX 5690 ktis kosi/486 . 338

SFX 5691 Y 2
SFX 5691 kti ko/487 . 338
SFX 5691 ktis kosi/487 . 338

SFX 5695 Y 2
SFX 5695 sti sti/464 . 336
SFX 5695 stis stis/464 . 336

SFX 5696 Y 2
SFX 5696 sti sti/465 . 336
SFX 5696 stis stis/465 . 336

SFX 5697 Y 2
SFX 5697 sti sti/466 . 336
SFX 5697 stis stis/466 . 336

SFX 5698 Y 2
SFX 5698 sti sti/467 . 336
SFX 5698 stis stis/467 . 336

SFX 5699 Y 2
SFX 5699 sti sti/468 . 336
SFX 5699 stis stis/468 . 336

SFX 5700 Y 2
SFX 5700 sti sti/469 . 336
SFX 5700 stis stis/469 . 336

SFX 5701 Y 2
SFX 5701 sti sti/470 . 336
SFX 5701 stis stis/470 . 336

SFX 5702 Y 2
SFX 5702 sti sti/471 . 336
SFX 5702 stis stis/471 . 336

SFX 5703 Y 2
SFX 5703 sti sti/472 . 336
SFX 5703 stis stis/472 . 336

SFX 5704 Y 2
SFX 5704 sti sti/473 . 336
SFX 5704 stis stis/473 . 336

SFX 5715 Y 2
SFX 5715 sti čia/474 . 337
SFX 5715 stis čiasi/474 . 337

SFX 5716 Y 2
SFX 5716 sti čia/475 . 337
SFX 5716 stis čiasi/475 . 337

SFX 5717 Y 2
SFX 5717 sti čia/476 . 337
SFX 5717 stis čiasi/476 . 337

SFX 5718 Y 2
SFX 5718 sti čia/477 . 337
SFX 5718 stis čiasi/477 . 337

SFX 5719 Y 2
SFX 5719 sti čia/478 . 337
SFX 5719 stis čiasi/478 . 337

SFX 5720 Y 2
SFX 5720 sti čia/479 . 337
SFX 5720 stis čiasi/479 . 337

SFX 5721 Y 2
SFX 5721 sti čia/480 . 337
SFX 5721 stis čiasi/480 . 337

SFX 5722 Y 2
SFX 5722 sti čia/481 . 337
SFX 5722 stis čiasi/481 . 337

SFX 5723 Y 2
SFX 5723 sti čia/482 . 337
SFX 5723 stis čiasi/482 . 337

SFX 5733 Y 1
SFX 5733 sti tie/483 . 337

SFX 5734 Y 1
SFX 5734 stis tie/484 . 337

SFX 5735 Y 2
SFX 5735 sti tė/485 . 338
SFX 5735 stis tėsi/485 . 338

SFX 5736 Y 2
SFX 5736 sti tė/486 . 338
SFX 5736 stis tėsi/486 . 338

SFX 5737 Y 2
SFX 5737 sti tė/487 . 338
SFX 5737 stis tėsi/487 . 338

SFX 5741 Y 2
SFX 5741 sti sti/464 . 336
SFX 5741 stis stis/464 . 336

SFX 5742 Y 2
SFX 5742 sti sti/465 . 336
SFX 5742 stis stis/465 . 336

SFX 5743 Y 2
SFX 5743 sti sti/466 . 336
SFX 5743 stis stis/466 . 336

SFX 5744 Y 2
SFX 5744 sti sti/467 . 336
SFX 5744 stis stis/467 . 336

SFX 5745 Y 2
SFX 5745 sti sti/468 . 336
SFX 5745 stis stis/468 . 336

SFX 5746 Y 2
SFX 5746 sti sti/469 . 336
SFX 5746 stis stis/469 . 336

SFX 5747 Y 2
SFX 5747 sti sti/470 . 336
SFX 5747 stis stis/470 . 336

SFX 5748 Y 2
SFX 5748 sti sti/471 . 336
SFX 5748 stis stis/471 . 336

SFX 5749 Y 2
SFX 5749 sti sti/472 . 336
SFX 5749 stis stis/472 . 336

SFX 5750 Y 2
SFX 5750 sti sti/473 . 336
SFX 5750 stis stis/473 . 336

SFX 5761 Y 2
SFX 5761 sti sta/474 . 337
SFX 5761 stis stasi/474 . 337

SFX 5762 Y 2
SFX 5762 sti sta/475 . 337
SFX 5762 stis stasi/475 . 337

SFX 5763 Y 2
SFX 5763 sti sta/476 . 337
SFX 5763 stis stasi/476 . 337

SFX 5764 Y 2
SFX 5764 sti sta/477 . 337
SFX 5764 stis stasi/477 . 337

SFX 5765 Y 2
SFX 5765 sti sta/478 . 337
SFX 5765 stis stasi/478 . 337

SFX 5766 Y 2
SFX 5766 sti sta/479 . 337
SFX 5766 stis stasi/479 . 337

SFX 5767 Y 2
SFX 5767 sti sta/480 . 337
SFX 5767 stis stasi/480 . 337

SFX 5768 Y 2
SFX 5768 sti sta/481 . 337
SFX 5768 stis stasi/481 . 337

SFX 5769 Y 2
SFX 5769 sti sta/482 . 337
SFX 5769 stis stasi/482 . 337

SFX 5779 Y 1
SFX 5779 sti stie/483 . 337

SFX 5780 Y 1
SFX 5780 stis stie/484 . 337

SFX 5781 Y 2
SFX 5781 sti do/485 . 338
SFX 5781 stis dosi/485 . 338

SFX 5782 Y 2
SFX 5782 sti do/486 . 338
SFX 5782 stis dosi/486 . 338

SFX 5783 Y 2
SFX 5783 sti do/487 . 338
SFX 5783 stis dosi/487 . 338

SFX 5787 Y 2
SFX 5787 auti auti/464 . 336
SFX 5787 autis autis/464 . 336

SFX 5788 Y 2
SFX 5788 auti auti/465 . 336
SFX 5788 autis autis/465 . 336

SFX 5789 Y 2
SFX 5789 auti auti/466 . 336
SFX 5789 autis autis/466 . 336

SFX 5790 Y 2
SFX 5790 auti auti/467 . 336
SFX 5790 autis autis/467 . 336

SFX 5791 Y 2
SFX 5791 auti auti/468 . 336
SFX 5791 autis autis/468 . 336

SFX 5792 Y 2
SFX 5792 auti auti/469 . 336
SFX 5792 autis autis/469 . 336

SFX 5793 Y 2
SFX 5793 auti auti/470 . 336
SFX 5793 autis autis/470 . 336

SFX 5794 Y 2
SFX 5794 auti auti/471 . 336
SFX 5794 autis autis/471 . 336

SFX 5795 Y 2
SFX 5795 auti auti/472 . 336
SFX 5795 autis autis/472 . 336

SFX 5796 Y 2
SFX 5796 auti auti/473 . 336
SFX 5796 autis autis/473 . 336

SFX 5807 Y 2
SFX 5807 auti auna/474 . 337
SFX 5807 autis aunasi/474 . 337

SFX 5808 Y 2
SFX 5808 auti auna/475 . 337
SFX 5808 autis aunasi/475 . 337

SFX 5809 Y 2
SFX 5809 auti auna/476 . 337
SFX 5809 autis aunasi/476 . 337

SFX 5810 Y 2
SFX 5810 auti auna/477 . 337
SFX 5810 autis aunasi/477 . 337

SFX 5811 Y 2
SFX 5811 auti auna/478 . 337
SFX 5811 autis aunasi/478 . 337

SFX 5812 Y 2
SFX 5812 auti auna/479 . 337
SFX 5812 autis aunasi/479 . 337

SFX 5813 Y 2
SFX 5813 auti auna/480 . 337
SFX 5813 autis aunasi/480 . 337

SFX 5814 Y 2
SFX 5814 auti auna/481 . 337
SFX 5814 autis aunasi/481 . 337

SFX 5815 Y 2
SFX 5815 auti auna/482 . 337
SFX 5815 autis aunasi/482 . 337

SFX 5825 Y 1
SFX 5825 auti aunie/483 . 337

SFX 5826 Y 1
SFX 5826 autis aunie/484 . 337

SFX 5827 Y 2
SFX 5827 auti ovė/485 . 338
SFX 5827 autis ovėsi/485 . 338

SFX 5828 Y 2
SFX 5828 auti ovė/486 . 338
SFX 5828 autis ovėsi/486 . 338

SFX 5829 Y 2
SFX 5829 auti ovė/487 . 338
SFX 5829 autis ovėsi/487 . 338

SFX 5833 Y 2
SFX 5833 erti erti/464 . 336
SFX 5833 ertis ertis/464 . 336

SFX 5834 Y 2
SFX 5834 erti erti/465 . 336
SFX 5834 ertis ertis/465 . 336

SFX 5835 Y 2
SFX 5835 erti erti/466 . 336
SFX 5835 ertis ertis/466 . 336

SFX 5836 Y 2
SFX 5836 erti erti/467 . 336
SFX 5836 ertis ertis/467 . 336

SFX 5837 Y 2
SFX 5837 erti erti/468 . 336
SFX 5837 ertis ertis/468 . 336

SFX 5838 Y 2
SFX 5838 erti erti/469 . 336
SFX 5838 ertis ertis/469 . 336

SFX 5839 Y 2
SFX 5839 erti erti/470 . 336
SFX 5839 ertis ertis/470 . 336

SFX 5840 Y 2
SFX 5840 erti erti/471 . 336
SFX 5840 ertis ertis/471 . 336

SFX 5841 Y 2
SFX 5841 erti erti/472 . 336
SFX 5841 ertis ertis/472 . 336

SFX 5842 Y 2
SFX 5842 erti erti/473 . 336
SFX 5842 ertis ertis/473 . 336

SFX 5853 Y 2
SFX 5853 erti eria/474 . 337
SFX 5853 ertis eriasi/474 . 337

SFX 5854 Y 2
SFX 5854 erti eria/475 . 337
SFX 5854 ertis eriasi/475 . 337

SFX 5855 Y 2
SFX 5855 erti eria/476 . 337
SFX 5855 ertis eriasi/476 . 337

SFX 5856 Y 2
SFX 5856 erti eria/477 . 337
SFX 5856 ertis eriasi/477 . 337

SFX 5857 Y 2
SFX 5857 erti eria/478 . 337
SFX 5857 ertis eriasi/478 . 337

SFX 5858 Y 2
SFX 5858 erti eria/479 . 337
SFX 5858 ertis eriasi/479 . 337

SFX 5859 Y 2
SFX 5859 erti eria/480 . 337
SFX 5859 ertis eriasi/480 . 337

SFX 5860 Y 2
SFX 5860 erti eria/481 . 337
SFX 5860 ertis eriasi/481 . 337

SFX 5861 Y 2
SFX 5861 erti eria/482 . 337
SFX 5861 ertis eriasi/482 . 337

SFX 5871 Y 1
SFX 5871 erti erie/483 . 337

SFX 5872 Y 1
SFX 5872 ertis erie/484 . 337

SFX 5873 Y 2
SFX 5873 erti ėrė/485 . 338
SFX 5873 ertis ėrėsi/485 . 338

SFX 5874 Y 2
SFX 5874 erti ėrė/486 . 338
SFX 5874 ertis ėrėsi/486 . 338

SFX 5875 Y 2
SFX 5875 erti ėrė/487 . 338
SFX 5875 ertis ėrėsi/487 . 338

SFX 5879 Y 2
SFX 5879 bti bti/464 . 336
SFX 5879 btis btis/464 . 336

SFX 5880 Y 2
SFX 5880 bti bti/465 . 336
SFX 5880 btis btis/465 . 336

SFX 5881 Y 2
SFX 5881 bti bti/466 . 336
SFX 5881 btis btis/466 . 336

SFX 5882 Y 2
SFX 5882 bti bti/467 . 336
SFX 5882 btis btis/467 . 336

SFX 5883 Y 2
SFX 5883 bti bti/468 . 336
SFX 5883 btis btis/468 . 336

SFX 5884 Y 2
SFX 5884 bti bti/469 . 336
SFX 5884 btis btis/469 . 336

SFX 5885 Y 2
SFX 5885 bti bti/470 . 336
SFX 5885 btis btis/470 . 336

SFX 5886 Y 2
SFX 5886 bti bti/471 . 336
SFX 5886 btis btis/471 . 336

SFX 5887 Y 2
SFX 5887 bti bti/472 . 336
SFX 5887 btis btis/472 . 336

SFX 5888 Y 2
SFX 5888 bti bti/473 . 336
SFX 5888 btis btis/473 . 336

SFX 5899 Y 2
SFX 5899 bti mba/474 . 337
SFX 5899 btis mbasi/474 . 337

SFX 5900 Y 2
SFX 5900 bti mba/475 . 337
SFX 5900 btis mbasi/475 . 337

SFX 5901 Y 2
SFX 5901 bti mba/476 . 337
SFX 5901 btis mbasi/476 . 337

AF 5649,5650,5669,5689,65521 # 88
AF 5879,5880,5899,5919,65521 # 123
AF 5787,5788,5807,5827,65521 # 141
AF 5833,5834,5853,5873,65521 # 145
AF 5741,5742,5761,5781,65521 # 156
AF 5695,5696,5715,5735,65521 # 157
AF 5695,5696,5704,5715,5723,5735,5737,65521 # 202
AF 5833,5834,5842,5853,5861,5873,5875,65521 # 239
AF 5741,5742,5743,5745,5746,5748,5750,5761,5762,5764,5765,5767,5769,5781,5783,65521 # 384
AF 5787,5788,5789,5792,5807,5808,5811,5827,65521 # 425
