lt-LT_morphology.dic
apšviesti/202	11
aptikti/88	11
apžlibti/123	11
atsipjauti/141	13
atsiriesti/157	13
atverti/239	11
beaptikti/88	11
berti/145	11
bukti/88	11
glebti/123	11
įjuosti/156	11
įkaisti/157	11
įkibti/123	11
įkrauti/141	11
išglebti/123	11
išplikti/88	11
išrausti/156	11
išrauti/141	11
išsinerti/145	13
išsiversti/157	13
kakti/88	11
kirsti/156	11
kniubti/123	11
liestis/157	13
neapgriauti/141	33
neapsmukti/88	33
neapšlubti/123	33
neapšviesti/202	33
neatsibosti/156	34
neatsipjauti/141	34
neatsiverti/145	34
nebeapsiversti/157	34
nebeįsmukti/88	33
nebeišspjauti/141	33
nebeįverti/145	33
nebekibti/123	33
nebeklysti/156	33
nebekviesti/157	33
nebepaslysti/156	33
nebeperkrauti/141	33
nebeplikti/88	33
nebeprisikviesti/157	34
nebeslysti/156	33
nebestverti/145	33
nebesugriauti/141	33
nebesusiriesti/157	34
nebesuskubti/123	33
nebeužtrukti/88	33
neglebti/123	33
neįgerti/145	33
neįsikibti/123	34
neįsipjauti/141	34
neišgirsti/156	33
neišsikviesti/157	34
neiššauti/141	33
neišvysti/156	33
neįverti/145	33
nekibti/123	33
neklysti/384	33
nekrikti/88	33
nenurausti/156	33
nenusirauti/141	34
nenusiversti/157	34
nepagerti/145	33
nepakibti/123	33
nepakirsti/156	33
nepasiversti/157	34
nepaslysti/156	33
nepatikti/88	33
neperkrauti/141	33
neperšerti/145	33
neprašauti/141	33
neprisiversti/157	34
nerti/145	11
neskirsti/156	33
nespjauti/141	33
nesuglebti/123	33
nesukeisti/157	33
nesusekti/88	33
nesusikibti/123	34
nesusinerti/145	34
neužgirsti/156	33
neužriesti/157	33
neužsimauti/141	34
neužsitverti/145	34
neužtrukti/88	33
nusirauti/141	13
nustebti/123	11
nušerti/145	11
pakaisti/157	11
pakirsti/156	11
pasišviesti/157	13
pasitikti/88	13
pažerti/145	11
pjautis/141	13
prasmirsti/156	11
praverti/145	11
smukti/88	11
speistis/157	13
sprūsti/156	11
sugrubti/123	11
sumauti/425	11
susiberti/145	13
susikrauti/141	13
sutrikti/88	11
teatsigerti/145	13
tebekeisti/157	11
tebepasigirsti/156	13
tebesužibti/123	11
tebetekti/88	11
tenerti/145	11
tesuklysti/156	11
tesurikti/88	11
teužjausti/157	11
užakti/88	11
užkibti/123	11
užmauti/141	11
